Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2904
Approved educational program, defined.

Approved educational program means a program for the education and training of physical therapists and physical therapist assistants approved by the board pursuant to section 38-2926.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 121;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,365;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 997.